District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-213.03

Automatic data processing — Delegation of certain Mayoral authority.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-168, § 4, 32 DCR 721
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 305(b), 44 DCR 1423